test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_piehanj_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - piehânj: # ok
    piehânj+N+Sg+Nom: piehânj
    piehânj+N+Sg+Gen: piehânj
    piehânj+N+Sg+Acc: piehânj
    piehânj+N+Sg+Ill: piehânjân
    piehânj+N+Sg+Loc: piehânjist
    piehânj+N+Sg+Com: piehânjáin
    piehânj+N+Sg+Abe: piehâinttáá
    piehânj+N+Ess: piehânjin
    piehânj+N+Par: piehânjid
    piehânj+N+Pl+Nom: piehânjeh
    piehânj+N+Pl+Gen: piehânjij
    piehânj+N+Pl+Acc: piehânjijd
    piehânj+N+Pl+Ill: piehânjáid
    piehânj+N+Pl+Loc: piehânjijn
    piehânj+N+Pl+Com: piehânjijguin
    piehânj+N+Pl+Abe: piehânjijttáá
  
  Noun - kahhaanj: # ok
    kahhaanj+N+Sg+Nom: kahhaanj 
    kahhaanj+N+Sg+Gen: kahhaanj
    kahhaanj+N+Sg+Acc: kahhaanj
    kahhaanj+N+Sg+Ill: kahanjân
    kahhaanj+N+Sg+Loc: kahanjist
    kahhaanj+N+Sg+Com: kahanjáin
    kahhaanj+N+Sg+Abe: kahhaanttáá
    kahhaanj+N+Ess: kahanjin
    kahhaanj+N+Par: kahanjid
    kahhaanj+N+Pl+Nom: kahanjeh
    kahhaanj+N+Pl+Gen: kahanjij
    kahhaanj+N+Pl+Acc: kahanjijd
    kahhaanj+N+Pl+Ill: kahanjáid
    kahhaanj+N+Pl+Loc: kahanjijn
    kahhaanj+N+Pl+Com: kahanjijguin
    kahhaanj+N+Pl+Abe: kahanjijttáá


  Noun - vuolânj: # ok
    vuolânj+N+Sg+Nom: vuolânj
    vuolânj+N+Sg+Gen: vuolânj
    vuolânj+N+Sg+Acc: vuolânj
    vuolânj+N+Sg+Ill: vuolânjân
    vuolânj+N+Sg+Loc: vuolânjist
    vuolânj+N+Sg+Com: vuolânjáin
    vuolânj+N+Sg+Abe: vuolâinttáá
    vuolânj+N+Ess: vuolânjin
    vuolânj+N+Par: vuolânjid
    vuolânj+N+Pl+Nom: vuolânjeh
    vuolânj+N+Pl+Gen: vuolânjij
    vuolânj+N+Pl+Acc: vuolânjijd
    vuolânj+N+Pl+Ill: vuolânjáid
    vuolânj+N+Pl+Loc: vuolânjijn
    vuolânj+N+Pl+Com: vuolânjijguin
    vuolânj+N+Pl+Abe: vuolânjijttáá
    
  Noun - suoppânj: # ok
    suoppânj+N+Sg+Nom: suoppânj
    suoppânj+N+Sg+Gen: suoppânj
    suoppânj+N+Sg+Acc: suoppânj
    suoppânj+N+Sg+Ill: suopânjân
    suoppânj+N+Sg+Loc: suopânjist
    suoppânj+N+Sg+Com: suopânjáin
    suoppânj+N+Sg+Abe: suoppâinttáá
    suoppânj+N+Ess: suopânjin
    suoppânj+N+Par: suopânjid
    suoppânj+N+Pl+Nom: suopânjeh
    suoppânj+N+Pl+Gen: suopânjij
    suoppânj+N+Pl+Acc: suopânjijd
    suoppânj+N+Pl+Ill: suopânjáid
    suoppânj+N+Pl+Loc: suopânjijn
    suoppânj+N+Pl+Com: suopânjijguin
    suoppânj+N+Pl+Abe: suopânjijttáá

  Noun - kiäruin: # ok
    kiärunj+N+Sg+Nom: kiärunj 
    kiärunj+N+Sg+Gen: kiärunj
    kiärunj+N+Sg+Acc: kiärunj
    kiärunj+N+Sg+Ill: kiärunjân
    kiärunj+N+Sg+Loc: kiärunjist
    kiärunj+N+Sg+Com: kiärunjáin
    kiärunj+N+Sg+Abe: kiäruinttáá
    kiärunj+N+Ess: kiärunjin
    kiärunj+N+Par: kiärunjid
    kiärunj+N+Pl+Nom: kiärunjeh
    kiärunj+N+Pl+Gen: kiärunjij
    kiärunj+N+Pl+Acc: kiärunjijd
    kiärunj+N+Pl+Ill: kiärunjáid
    kiärunj+N+Pl+Loc: kiärunjijn
    kiärunj+N+Pl+Com: kiärunjijguin
    kiärunj+N+Pl+Abe: kiärunjijttáá
